Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF848.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; LOGGERS SAFETY GRANT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of labor and industry for the loggers safety grant program under Minnesota Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 10, article 3, section 21. new text end